Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5810
Notice to certificate holder or subscribers; identification and disclosure of collections.

(1) If an insurer utilizes the services of a third-party administrator, the third-party administrator shall provide a written notice approved by the insurer to certificate holders or subscribers advising them of the identity of and relationship among the third-party administrator, the policyholder or contract holder, and the insurer.

(2) When a third-party administrator collects charges, the reason for collection of each item shall be identified to the policyholder or contract holder and each item shall be shown separately from any premium. Additional charges shall not be made for services to the extent the services have been paid for by the insurer.

(3) The third-party administrator shall disclose to the insurer all charges, fees, and commissions received in connection with the providing of administrative services for the insurer, including any fees or commissions paid by insurers providing reinsurance.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 85.